Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201383-387
Residential
facilities; patient; discharge or transfer; notice; responsibility of department.

At such time as the department determines that continued
residence in a residential facility will no longer benefit a person with an intellectual disability, the
department shall arrange for the discharge or transfer of such person from
the residential facility. The department shall give reasonable notice to the
person authorized to make an application for admission for such person under
subsection (1) of section 83-383 that the department intends to discharge
or transfer such person. The department shall also be responsible for the
placement of such person in any other available program or facility and in
the development of other methods for the care, treatment, and training of
such person.

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 7, p. 3066;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 51;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 804;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 57.
September 6, 2013